New York, session 2025-2026, A9531.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 58 of the civil service law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 1-d to read as follows: 3 1-d. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including 4 any other provision of this section, the county of Clinton, may author- 5 ize the appointment and employment, without examination or compliance 6 with any other requirement of this section, as a special patrol officer, 7 of any retired former member of the division of state police. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08269-04-6